Utah statutes.
61-2b-25.   Other law unaffected.
Nothing contained in this chapter shall be considered to prohibit a person
approved, licensed, or certified under this chapter from engaging in the
practice of real estate appraising as a professional corporation or a limited
liability company in accordance with:
(1)  Title 16, Chapter 11, Professional Corporation Act; or
(2)  Title 48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act.
